Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-157
State property; inventory; how stamped; action to recover.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, each executive, department, commission, or other state agency, and the Supreme Court, shall annually make or cause to be made an inventory of all property, including furniture and equipment, belonging to the State of Nebraska and in the possession, custody, or control of any executive, department, commission, or other state agency. The inventory shall include property in the possession, custody, or control of each executive, department, commission, or other state agency as of June 30 and shall be completed and filed with the materiel administrator by August 31 of each year.

(2) If any of the property of the state, referred to in subsection (1) of this section, is lost, destroyed, or unaccounted for by the negligence or carelessness of the executive, department, commission, or other state agency, the State Building Administrator shall, with the advice of the Attorney General, take the proper steps to recover such state property or the reasonable value thereof from the executive, department, commission, or other state agency charged with the same and from the person bonding such executive, department, commission, or other state agency, if any.

(3) Each such executive, department, commission, or other state agency shall indelibly tag, mark, or stamp all such property belonging to the State of Nebraska, with the following: Property of the State of Nebraska. In the inventory required by subsection (1) of this section, each such executive, department, commission, or other state agency shall state positively that each item of such property has been so tagged, marked, or stamped.

(4) This section does not apply to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska or the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges.

Laws 1937, c. 161, § 1, p. 625;

Laws 1939, c. 94, § 1, p. 407;

Laws 1941, c. 144, § 1, p. 573;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-707;

R.S.1943, § 72-707;

Laws 1955, c. 278, § 3, p. 881;

Laws 1957, c. 306, § 1, p. 1112;

Laws 1959, c. 331, § 2, p. 1205;

Laws 1963, c. 418, § 3, p. 1343;

R.R.S.1943, § 72-707;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 39;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 32;

Laws 1984, LB 933, § 17;

Laws 1989, LB 256, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB59, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 106;

R.S.Supp.,2023, § 81-1118.02;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 36.
July 19, 2024